Utah statutes.
4-34-2.   Donation to charitable organization authorized.

Any person engaged in the business of producing, processing, selling, or distributing any agricultural product may donate, free of charge, any such product which is in a fit condition for use as food for human consumption to a nonprofit charitable organization within the state of Utah. 

